src/fst/phonology-morph-bound.twolc
!!€ ê-<mow2>i2ht
!!€ ê-<mow>iht
! 
! #ê-ayawikoyâhk
! ê - %<: a y a w2:w %>: i2:i k o y â h k 
! 
!!€ ê-<ayaw2>i2koyâhk
!!€ ê-<ayaw>ikoyâhk 
! 
! ##VTA-3(Cw) act like Cw nouns for all i2 and i suffixes (summarised below)
! #mark as normal w, w>o applies for i and i2
! #seem to need î2? for delayed 2>1 imp
! 
! #kikîskison - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
! k i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 n 
! 
!!€ kit2<kîskisw>in
!!€ ki0<kîskiso>0n
! 
! #nikîskisomâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
! n i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 m â w a 
! 
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2mâwa
!!€ ni0<kîskiso>0mâwa
! 
! #ê-kîskisotân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 t â n
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2tân
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0tân
! 
! #ê-kîskisot
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 t 
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>it 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0t
! 
! #ê-kîskisosk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 s k 
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2sk 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0sk
! 
! #ê-kîskisokoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 k o y â h k
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0koyâhk
!  
! #nikîskisokawin - VTA X>1SgO
! n i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 k a w i n 
! 
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2kawin
!!€ ni0<kîskiso>0kawin
! 
! #kîskison - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
! k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 n 
! 
!!€ kîskisw>in 
!!€ kîskiso>0n
! 
! #kîskisôhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
! k î s k i s w:ô %>: ii2:0 h k a n 
! 
!!€ kîskisw>ii2hkan
!!€ kîskisô>0hkan

! ##VTA-2(aw)
! ##requires new coding, i2 instead of WI trigger
! ##i does not trigger VGi > V:
! #i2 for all 1>2, -im... -iko..., -ikawi..., -i2sk, -i2ht, -i2hcik
! #î2 does not collapse
! 
! #kinitonawin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
! k i t2:0 %<: n i t o n a w %>: i n 
! 
!!€ kit2<nitonaw>in 
!!€ ki0<nitonaw>in
! 
! #ninitonâmâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
! n i t2:0 %<: n i t o n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 m â w a 
! 
!!€ nit2<nitonaw>i2mâwa
!!€ ni0<nitonâ0>0mâwa
! 
! #ê-nitonawitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: n i t o n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 t â n
! 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2tân
!!€ ê-<nitonâ0>0tân
! 
! #ê-kîskisot
! ê - %<: n i t o n a w %>: i t 
! 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>it 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>it
! 
! #ê-nitonâsk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: n i t o n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 s k
! 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2sk 
!!€ ê-<nitonâ0>0sk
!  
! #ê-nitonâkoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
! ê - %<: n i t o n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 k o y â h k 
! 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-<nitonâ0>0koyâhk
! 
! #ninitonâkawin - VTA X>1SgO
! n i t2:0 %<: n i t o n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 k a w i n
! 
!!€ nit2<nitonaw>i2kawin
!!€ ni0<nitonâ0>0kawin
! 
! #nitonawin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
! n i t o n a w %>: i n 
! 
!!€ nitonaw>in 
!!€ nitonaw>in
! 
! #nitonawîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
! n i t o n a w %>: î2:î h k a n 
! 
!!€ nitonaw>îhkan
!!€ nitonaw>îhkan
! 
! 
! ##VTA-4 (t3) 
! ## t3 > s / _{-i,-î2}; t3 > t / _-i2  

"t2sVTA4Rule"
t3:s <=> _ [ Bx: [ i: | ii2: ] ] | .#. ;

! Corresponding otherwise rule 
! t3:t <=> \[ i | ii2 ] ;

! #kinakasin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
! k i t2:0 %<: n a k a t3:s %>: i n 
! 
!!€ kit2<nakat3>in 
!!€ ki0<nakas>in
! 
! #ninakatimâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
! n i t2:0 %<: n a k a t3:t %>: i2:i m â w a 
! 
!!€ nit2<nakat3>i2mâwa 
!!€ ni0<nakat>imâwa
! 
! #ê-nakatitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: n a k a t3:t %>: i2:i t â n
! 
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2t>ân 
!!€ ê-<nakat>it>ân
! 
! #ê-nakasit
! ê - %<: n a k a t3:s %>: i t 
! 
!!€ ê-<nakat3>it
!!€ ê-<nakas>it
! 
! #ê-nakatisk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: n a k a t3:t %>: i2:i s k 
! 
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2sk 
!!€ ê-<nakat>isk
! 
! #ê-nakatikoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
! ê - %>: n a k a t3:t %>: i2:i k o y â h k 
! 
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-<nakat>ikoyâhk
! 
! #ninakatikawin - VTA X>1SgO
! n i t2:0 %<: n a k a t3:t %>: i2:i k a w i n
! 
!!€ nit2<nakat3>i2kawin
!!€ ni0<nakat>ikawin
! 
! #nakasin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
! n a k a t3:s %>: i n 
! 
!!€ nakat3>in 
!!€ nakas>in
! 
! #nakasîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
! n a k a t3:s %>: ii2:î h k a n
! 
!!€ nakat3>ii2hkan 
!!€ nakas>îhkan
! 
! 
! ##VTA idiosyncratic cases
! #s > 0 / _ t3-i -  just kostew

"t3kostewRule"
s:0 <=> _ t3:s ;

! #kikosin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
! k i t2:0 %<: k o s:0 t3:s %>: i n 
! 
!!€ kit2<kost3>in 
!!€ ki0<ko0s>in
! 
! #nikostimâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
! n i t2:0 %<: k o s t3:t %>: i2:i m â w a 
! 
!!€ nit2<kost3>i2mâwa 
!!€ ni0<kost>imâwa
! 
! #ê-kostitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k o s t3:t %>: i2:i t â n
! 
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2tân
!!€ ê-<kost>itân
! 
! #ê-kosit
! ê - %>: k o s:0 t3:s %>: i t 
! 
!!€ ê-<kost3>it 
!!€ ê-<ko0s>it
! 
! #ê-kostisk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k o s t3:t %>: i2:i s k 
! 
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2sk
!!€ ê-<kost>isk
! 
! #ê-kostikoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
! ê - %<: k o s t3:t %>: i2:i k o y â h k
! 
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2koyâhk
!!€ ê-<kost>ikoyâhk
!  
! #nikostikawin - VTA X>1SgO
! n i t2:0 %<: k o s t3:t %>: i2:i k a w i n
! 
!!€ nit2<kost3>i2kawin
!!€ ni0<kost>ikawin
! 
! #kosin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
! k o s:0 t3:s %>: i n 
! 
!!€ kost3>in 
!!€ ko0s>in
! 
! #kosîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
! k o s:0 t3:s %>: ii2:î h k a n
! 
!!€ kost3>ii2hkan 
!!€ ko0s>îhkan
! 
! ##monosyllabic VTAs in the imp 2Sg>3Sg "TACONJ-5"
! #these have i as the inflection - ahêw, kostêw, itêw, ay-itêw
! #should be ahi, kosi, isi, ay-isi (by my logic, need to be checked)
! #making this i3 instead of i2 
! #i3 > i / _ # << i3 must act like i or î2, not i2
! #i3 > 0 otherwise << deletion rule can be tested with kostêw above
! #itêw has been marked as TACONJ-1, but it definitely has t>s in corpus
! 
! #isi - VTA imp 2Sg>3SgO
! i t3:s %>: i3:i 

! The following morphophonological changes implemented with their own
! specific continuation lexica

! !!€ it3>i3
! !!€ is0i
! 
! #kosi
! k o s:0 t3:s %>: i3:i 
! 
! !!€ kost3>i3 
! !!€ ko0s>i
! 
! #ahi
! a h %>: i3:i
! 
! !!€ ah>i3 
! !!€ ah>i

! Needed for diminutivization of mîwas with stem-final t3
"t3DimRule"
t3:c <=> _ %>: i2: %^DIM:0 ;

!!€ mi4<îwat3>i2^DIMs
!!€ m0<îwac>i0s

! Matching weak/strong reduplication consonant placeholder d1 with stem-initial consonant
"ReduplCRule1"
!! **@RULENAME@**
d1:Cx <=> _ (0:i 0:y) [ a: y2: | â: h ] (%^IC:0) ( %-: ) %<: Cx: ;
   where Cx in ( c k m n p s t w y ) ;

! Setting double weak+strong reduplication consonant placeholder d2 with stem-initial consonant"
"ReduplCRule2"
!! **@RULENAME@**
d2:Cx <=> _ (0:i 0:y) a: y3:0 ( %-: ) d1:Cx ;
   where Cx in ( c k m n p s t w y ) ;

!Inserting epenthetic y in weak reduplication of vowel-initial stem
"ReduplY2Rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**
y2:y <=> d1:0 (0:i 0:y) a: _ ;

!Inserting epenthetic y in strong+weak reduplication of vowel-initial stem
"ReduplY3Rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**
y3:y <=> _ ( %-: ) d1:0 ;

!!€ d1ay2-<nipâw
!!€ na0-<nipâw

!!€ d1âh-<nipâw
!!€ nâh-<nipâw

!!€ d2ay3-d1âh-<nipâw
!!€ na0-nâh-<nipâw

!!€ d2ay3-d1âh-<ayâw
!!€ 0ay-0âh-<ayâw

!!€ d1âh-<ayâw
!!€ 0âh-<ayâw

!!€ d1ay2-<ayâw
!!€ 0ay-<ayâw

!! INITIAL CHANGE
! i ~ ê
! a ~ ê
! î ~ â (iyî)
! o ~ ê ! W-A corpus evidence

! General Template
! v1:v2 <=> .#. (C) _ :* %^IC:0 ;

"v2vICRule"
Vx:ICx <=> .#. ( Consonant | d1: | d2: ) (0:w) _ :* %^IC:0 ;
   where Vx in  ( a i î o )
         ICx in ( ê ê â ê )
   matched ;

!!€ nipât^IC
!!€ nêpât0

!!€ miyo-<nipât^IC
!!€ mêyo-<nipât0

!!€ itwêt^IC
!!€ êtwêt0

!!€ apit^IC
!!€ êpit0

!!€ wayawit^IC
!!€ wêyawit0

!!€ îkatêhtêt^IC
!!€ âkatêhtêt0

!!€ nîmit^IC
!!€ nâmit0

!!€ 0ohcît^IC
!!€ wêhcît0

!!€ m0ostohtêt^IC
!!€ mwêstohtêt0

! o ~ wê

"o2weeICRule"
0:w <=> .#. (Consonant) _ o:ê :* %^IC:0 ;

!!€ 0oyôyot^IC
!!€ wêyôyot0

!!€ k0ocît^IC
!!€ kwêcît0

! î ~ (â) iyî
! ê ~ iyê
! â ~ iyâ
! ô ~ iyô

"iyvICRule1"
0:i <=> .#. (Consonant | d1: | d2: ) _ 0:y [ â | e | ê | î | ô ] :* %^IC:0 ;

"iyvICRule2"
0:y <=> .#. (Consonant | d1: | d2:) 0:i _ [ â | e | ê | î | ô ] :* %^IC:0 ;

"iyvICRule3"
Vx /<= .#. (Consonant | d1: | d2: ) _ :* %^IC:0 ;
   where Vx in ( â ê î ô ) ;

!!€ îkatêhât^IC
!!€ âkatêhât0

!!€ 00îkatêhât^IC
!!€ iyîkatêhât0

!!€ 00êskêt^IC
!!€ iyêskêt0

!!€ 00âcimot^IC
!!€ iyâcimot0

!!€ 00ôhkomit^IC
!!€ iyôhkomit0

"w2oNDRule"
w3:o <=> .#. _  %<: :Consonant ;

! "i20NDRule"
! i:0 <=> .#. w3:o _ %<: ;

!!€ w3<spiton
!!€ o<spiton

!!€ ni<spiton
!!€ ni<spiton

!!€ ki<spiton
!!€ ki<spiton

!!€ w3<îpit
!!€ w<îpit

!!€ w3<ahkwan
!!€ w<ahkwan

! n3:n

! n3<o -> nô
! n<i<tanis
! ni<tanis

! [nk]i<V[^o] -> [nk]0<V
! [nk]i<o -> [nk]0<ô

"i20VPossND"
i4:0 <=> .#. [ n | k | m ] _ %<: :Vowel ;

"o2ooPossND"
o:ô <=> .#. [ n | k | m ] i4:0 %<: _ ;

"w2oRuleND"
w3:0 <=> .#. _ %<: [ o | ô ] ;

!!€ ni4<ohkom
!!€ n0<ôhkom

!!€ ni4<ohkom>i2nân>ak
!!€ n0<ôhkom>inân>ak

!!€ ki4<ohkom
!!€ k0<ôhkom

!!€ w3<ohkom>a
!!€ 0<ohkom>a

"o2ooPossNoun"
o:ô <=> .#. [ [ n i ] | [ k i ] | o ] t2: %<: _ ;

!!€ nit2<ospwâkan
!!€ nit<ôspwâkan

!!€ kit2<ospwâkan
!!€ kit<ôspwâkan

!!€ ot2<ospwâkan
!!€ ot<ôspwâkan

"o2DelRule"
o2:0 <=> Vowel: _ ;

!!!!! END !!!!!
